Utah statutes.
78B-3-604.   Determination of causation -- Compensation allowed.

(1)  Causation of radiological injury from a nuclear incident shall be determined by the trier of fact, taking into account epidemiological studies, statistical probabilities, and other pertinent medical and scientific evidence.

(2)  A claimant under this part shall be entitled to full compensation of the claimant's radiological injuries if the trier of fact determines that it is more likely than not that the claimant's injuries resulted from the nuclear incident.

